Vermont, session 2025-2026, H11.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Vermont Broadband Consumer Protection and Competition Act * * *
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 63, subchapter 10A is added to read:
Subchapter 10A. Broadband Consumer Protection and Competition
§ 2490. TITLE
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as “the Vermont
Broadband Consumer Protection and Competition Act.”
VT LEG #378534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.11
2025 Page 2 of 17
§ 2490a. PURPOSE
The purpose of this subchapter is to promote a thriving broadband market in
Vermont free of anticompetitive, unfair, deceptive, or misleading practices in
order to protect the public and to encourage fair and honest competition.
§ 2490b. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Broadband is a critical sector of the overall Vermont economy.
(2) Broadband service is essential for supporting economic and
educational opportunities; strengthening health and public safety networks; and
reinforcing democratic, social, and civic engagement and for allowing
Vermonters to benefit from new and innovative internet-based products and
services, such as smart home energy-saving technologies.
(3) Despite considerable public investments in broadband deployment
and service, about 14.95 percent of Vermont locations (47,262 locations) do
not have access to high-speed broadband service. Many more do not have
access to service from more than one broadband provider.
(4) Vermont is a rural state with many geographically remote, sparsely
populated locations with no or limited access to public transit systems.
(5) Those who live far from a town center or regional commercial hub
are particularly disadvantaged by the lack of broadband access. They are
burdened with the additional time and expense of traveling great distances to
VT LEG #378534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.11
2025 Page 3 of 17
either access a broadband connection, such as a public Wi-Fi hotspot, or to
physically carry out activities they are unable to do from home, such as online
banking and telehealth appointments.
(6) The critical need for broadband service coupled with the lack of
competition, particularly in high-cost areas, creates an imbalance of power
between the provider and consumer.
(7) The Attorney General, as the chief law enforcement officer in the
State, must provide a strong presence in the broadband market and protect and
advocate for Vermonters when necessary.
(8) All policymakers, law enforcement officers, and regulators must
work collaboratively to ensure the market is vibrant, efficient, and competitive
and serves as an engine of economic growth and innovation in all four corners
of the State.
(9) No broadband provider should be permitted to exploit its market
position to stifle competition and deprive a consumer of a meaningful choice
among broadband providers.
(10) Monitoring the broadband market through data collection and
analysis will enable State government to identify and respond swiftly and
appropriately to market failures or misconduct and promote a healthy
economy.
VT LEG #378534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.11
2025 Page 4 of 17
(11) A well-functioning broadband marketplace will foster competition,
higher wages, lower prices, better service, more consumer choices, further
investment, and increased innovation and entrepreneurship.
§ 2490c. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Broadband provider” or “provider” means a business that provides
broadband service to any person in Vermont.
(2) “Broadband service” or “broadband” means a mass-market retail
service by wire or radio in Vermont that provides the capability to transmit
data to and receive data from all or substantially all internet endpoints,
including any capabilities that are incidental to and enable the operation of the
communications service, but excluding dial-up service.
(3) “Consumer” means a person to whom a broadband provider sells
broadband service.
§ 2490d. NET NEUTRALITY
Because the free and open flow of information underpins the free and open
flow of commerce, beginning on October 1, 2025, a broadband provider shall
not sell, offer, or advertise for sale broadband service without a valid
certificate of net neutrality compliance from the Secretary of Administration
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 348.
VT LEG #378534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.11
2025 Page 5 of 17
§ 2490e. PROHIBITED PRACTICES
(a) It shall be an unfair or deceptive act or practice in commerce in
violation of section 2453 of this chapter for a broadband provider to engage in
any of the following conduct:
(1) failing to provide a consumer with broadband service that meets or
exceeds the performance characteristics offered and sold to the consumer’s
service location;
(2) failing to reimburse a consumer any installation costs associated
with broadband service that is discontinued by the consumer because the
service did not meet or exceed the minimum performance characteristics
offered and sold to the consumer’s service location;
(3) engaging in marketing or promotional practices that misrepresent the
actual terms and conditions of a broadband service plan or tend to mislead or
deceive an actual or prospective consumer;
(4) imposing excessive termination fees or other burdensome conditions
that unfairly restrict a consumer’s ability to discontinue service or purchase
service from another provider;
(5) charging equipment or service fees that do not reasonably correlate
with the cost of the broadband service or equipment provided to a consumer,
excluding any State or federal fees;
VT LEG #378534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.11
2025 Page 6 of 17
(6) failing to submit broadband availability data in a form and manner
prescribed by the Department of Public Service for the purpose of maintaining
the State’s broadband availability maps under 30 V.S.A. § 202e(e);
(7) violating privacy, security, or network management practices
applicable to its broadband service; or
(8) imposing a predatory data cap, as further defined in subsection (b) of
this section.
(b) A broadband provider shall not impose a data cap except when tailored
for the purpose of reasonable network management, such as managing network
congestion. For purposes of this section, “data cap” means a limit on the
amount of bits or other units of information a broadband consumer may
download or upload during a period of time specified by the provider before
the consumer:
(1) is charged a fee for additional usage;
(2) is subject to an increasing cost per bit or other unit of information;
(3) is charged for an incremental block of usage;
(4) experiences a reduction of access speed; or
(5) is otherwise discouraged or prevented from exceeding.
§ 2490f. CONSUMER COMPLAINTS
(a) For the purpose of creating a single location within State government
for the receipt and tracking of consumer complaints regarding broadband
VT LEG #378534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.11
2025 Page 7 of 17
service, the Attorney General, in consultation with the Commissioner of Public
Service, shall establish and implement a protocol for handling complaints. The
protocol shall include a process for maintaining a database that aggregates and
tracks the number, nature, disposition status, and resolution time of complaints
received directly by State government and indirectly from provider records
submitted to the Attorney General under subsection (b) of this section.
(b) Beginning on January 1, 2026, a broadband provider shall maintain a
complete record of any consumer complaints received regarding its broadband
service. The record shall include the total number of complaints received, the
nature of each complaint, the disposition of each complaint, the time it took to
process and resolve each complaint, and any other relevant information
requested by the Attorney General. A provider shall submit a copy of the
record of complaints for the preceding year to the Office of the Attorney
General annually, beginning on January 1, 2027.
(c) As used in this section, “complaint” means any communication
primarily expressing a grievance.
§ 2490g. MONITORING COMPETITION AND PRACTICES
(a) The Attorney General shall routinely monitor current and emerging
market trends and business practices in the broadband sector and assess their
effect, positive or negative, on consumers, workers, businesses, and the
broader Vermont economy.
VT LEG #378534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.11
2025 Page 8 of 17
(b) Factors to be considered by the Attorney General under this section
include the number of broadband providers actively engaged in providing
broadband service, market share, ease of market entry, industry consolidation,
and any other factors the Attorney General deems relevant to a market
analysis.
(c) The Attorney General shall periodically review and compare a
provider’s broadband consumer label for multiple service locations in the
provider’s market area. For purposes of this subsection, “broadband consumer
label” means the label required to be provided to a consumer at the point of
sale, pursuant to the Federal Communications Commission’s Broadband
Labels Order, 37 FCC Rcd 13686, 13687, 13689-90, 13696, paras. 3, 12, 35
(2022).
(d) The Attorney General shall review provider business practices,
including data practices, as appropriate, to determine whether any practices
negatively affect marginalized or underserved communities or worsen
disparities and inequities in the social and economic fabric of our State.
(e)(1) To assist the Attorney General with carrying out the purposes of this
section, on or before October 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, each broadband
provider shall submit a report to the Attorney General, which includes the
following information related to its provision of fixed broadband service to
Vermont locations:
VT LEG #378534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.11
2025 Page 9 of 17
(A) the total number of active broadband service plans;
(B) the total number of active wired broadband service plans,
categorized by the technology used to deliver the service: digital subscriber
line, coaxial cable, fiber-optic, or hybrid fiber coaxial;
(C) the total number of active wireless broadband service plans,
categorized by the technology used to deliver the service: terrestrial or satellite
(geostationary or low-earth orbit), and whether the service is supported by
licensed or unlicensed spectrum, or both;
(D) the median and mean price, download speed, and upload speed of
its active broadband service plans in Vermont, and within each county, if
applicable;
(E) the number of years the provider has been actively engaged in
providing broadband service in Vermont;
(F) the broadband availability data submitted to the Department of
Public Service under 30 V.S.A. § 202e(e) and the broadband availability and
subscription data submitted to the Federal Communications Commission
through the Broadband Data Collection System; and
(G) any other information deemed relevant by the Attorney General.
(2) The report shall be submitted in a form and manner prescribed by the
Attorney General.
VT LEG #378534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.11
2025 Page 10 of 17
(3) It is unlawful for a provider to knowingly or recklessly make or
cause to be made, in a report submitted under this section, a statement that:
(A) at the time and in light of the circumstances under which it is
made, is false or misleading in a material respect; or
(B) is false or misleading due to the omission of a material fact.
(4) The accuracy of the information included in the report shall be
verified by oath of two of the provider’s executive officers, under penalty of
perjury.
(5) As used in this section, “recklessly” means consciously disregarding
a relevant fact.
§ 2490h. TRANSPARENCY; INFORMED CHOICES
(a) To facilitate informed consumer choices, a broadband provider shall
submit to the Attorney General its current policies and practices regarding:
(1) network management;
(2) security; and
(3) privacy.
(b) A provider shall submit the information required by this section in a
form and manner prescribed by the Attorney General, not less frequently than
annually.
VT LEG #378534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.11
2025 Page 11 of 17
(c) The Attorney General shall aggregate and disclose the information
collected under this section on a publicly available, easily accessible website
maintained by the Office of the Attorney General.
§ 2490i. KEEP VERMONTERS CONNECTED
(a) A broadband provider is prohibited from disconnecting any consumer
from service, charging unconscionably high prices, or imposing data usage
limits during a declared state of emergency under 20 V.S.A. chapter 1,
provided that the state of emergency is declared in response to an all-hazards
event that will cause financial hardship and the inability of consumers to pay
for broadband services.
(b) For purposes of this section, a price is unconscionably high if:
(1) there is a gross disparity between the price charged during the
emergency or seven days prior to the emergency and the price at which the
same service was sold or offered for sale in the usual course of business
immediately prior to the state of emergency; and
(2) the disparity is not substantially attributable to increased prices in the
wholesale market or increased costs due to the state of emergency.
§ 2490j. INVESTIGATIONS; ENFORCEMENT
(a) The Attorney General may investigate the business practices of a
broadband provider pursuant to the investigatory powers established under this
chapter.
VT LEG #378534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.11
2025 Page 12 of 17
(b) A person who violates a provision of this subchapter, or a rule adopted
pursuant to this subchapter, commits an unlawful act under section 2453 of this
chapter.
§ 2490k. INTERAGENCY COOPERATION
(a) The Attorney General, in consultation with the Secretary of
Administration, shall develop procedures and best practices for agency
cooperation and coordination on matters of overlapping jurisdiction. The
primary purpose of this section is to ensure the Attorney General has access to
information related to the Attorney General’s enforcement authority under this
subchapter, including any relevant information maintained by the Department
of Public Service, the Vermont Community Broadband Board, the Department
of Taxes, and the Agency of Commerce and Community Development.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to waive any privilege or
protection otherwise afforded information by law due solely to the fact that the
information is shared with the Attorney General pursuant to this section.
§ 2490l. ASSESSMENT
To the extent deemed necessary and appropriate by the Attorney General,
the costs incurred by the Office of the Attorney General in complying with this
subchapter may be assessed against broadband providers on an equitable and
practicable basis. The Attorney General shall adopt the assessment rate by
rule.
VT LEG #378534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.11
2025 Page 13 of 17
§ 2490m. CONFIDENTIALITY
The Attorney General shall maintain the confidentiality of any information
received under this subchapter that the Attorney General determines is exempt
from public inspection and copying under the Public Records Act or other
applicable law, unless disclosure is ordered by a court.
§ 2490n. ANNUAL REPORT
On or before January 15 of each year, notwithstanding 2 V.S.A. § 20(d), the
Attorney General shall submit a report to the General Assembly, which shall
include the Attorney General’s findings and recommendations related to the
current state of competition in the broadband market and whether and to what
extent anticompetitive conduct or unfair or deceptive acts or practices in
commerce are occurring. The report shall include:
(1) a summary of the market-monitoring data collected pursuant to
section 2490g of this subchapter;
(2) a summary of complaints in the State database established under
section 2490f of this subchapter;
(3) the total amount collected under section 2490l of this subchapter;
(4) a description of any enforcement actions taken pursuant to this
subchapter, and any monetary judgments recovered; and
(5) recommendations for improving conditions in the broadband market.
VT LEG #378534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.11
2025 Page 14 of 17
§ 2490o. RULES
(a) In addition to the rules otherwise required by this subchapter, the
Attorney General may adopt any other rules the Attorney General deems
necessary to implement this subchapter, including rules that define in greater
detail what constitutes unfair or deceptive conduct under this subchapter.
(b) The rules, as well as any finding of unlawful conduct under this
subchapter, shall be consistent with the rules, regulations, and decisions of the
Federal Trade Commission and the Federal Communications Commission and
with federal court interpretations of the Federal Trade Commission Act, as
amended, and the Communications Act of 1934, as amended.
§ 2490p. EFFECT ON OTHER LAWS
This subchapter shall not limit other statutory rights of a consumer or
statutory obligations of a provider under Vermont law.
§ 2490q. STATUTORY CONSTRUCTION; SEVERABILITY
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the provisions of this
subchapter are liberally construed to accomplish its purposes.
(b) As provided in 1 V.S.A. § 215, the provisions of this subchapter are
severable. If any provision of this subchapter is invalid, or if any application
thereof to any person or circumstance is invalid, the invalidity shall not affect
other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application.
VT LEG #378534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.11
2025 Page 15 of 17
§ 2490r. STATE AUTHORITY
Vermont enacts this subchapter pursuant to all inherent State authority
under the 10th Amendment to the U.S. Constitution and all relevant authority
granted and reserved to the states by Title 15 and Title 47 of the U.S. Code,
including the authority to impose requirements necessary to protect public
safety and welfare, safeguard the rights of consumers, and enforce antitrust
laws.
Sec. 2. REPEAL
9 V.S.A. § 2466c (concerning the Attorney General’s review of the network
management practices of broadband providers) is repealed.
* * * VoIP Service; Battery Backup; Compliance; Notice * * *
Sec. 3. VOIP SERVICE; CONSUMER PROTECTIONS
(a) The Commissioner of Public Service shall establish a program for
monitoring the health and public safety risks associated with the use of Voice
over Internet Protocol (VoIP) service in Vermont, particularly during
originating carrier or electric power outages. As used in this section, VoIP
service means a facilities-based, fixed, voice service that is not line powered.
(b) As part of the program, the Commissioner shall:
(1) Review, quarterly, the outage reports submitted to the E-911 Board
pursuant to the Board’s Rule Governing Outage Reporting Requirements for
Originating Carriers and Electric Power Companies to determine if there are
VT LEG #378534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.11
2025 Page 16 of 17
areas of the State particularly prone to carrier or power outages and assess
whether locations in those areas have access to facilities-based, fixed, voice
service that is line powered or to voice service offered by a Commercial
Mobile Radio Service provider.
(2) Establish a process for receiving an annual statement from each
VoIP provider offering service in the State certifying compliance with FCC
regulations concerning E-911 service, 47 C.F.R. § 9.5, and battery backup
power requirements, 47 C.F.R. § 12.5.
(3) Establish, in coordination with the Office of the Attorney General, a
mechanism for receiving and tracking any consumer complaints concerning
VoIP service quality and including a summary of any data collected in the
Department’s annual report to the General Assembly.
(4) Develop consumer education and community outreach initiatives
designed to ensure all consumers are aware of the risks and best practices
concerning emergency preparedness in the event of a power outage.
(5) Make recommendations to the General Assembly concerning any
additional consumer protections the Commissioner determines should be
available in Vermont, which may include additional backup power
requirements that supplement federal requirements, financial assistance to low-
income consumers for backup power equipment and installation costs,
VT LEG #378534 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.11
2025 Page 17 of 17
enhanced consumer outreach and education initiatives, and any other
requirements or initiatives deemed appropriate by the Commissioner.
(c) In developing the program required by this section, the Commissioner
of Public Service shall have the assistance of the E-911 Board, the Office of
the Attorney General, the Department of Public Safety, the Public Safety
Communications Task Force, and the Vermont League of Cities and Towns.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #378534 v.1